Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-507
Funds; transfer or diversion prohibited; exception; liability.

The money and credits in each fund authorized and created by sections 14-501 and 14-502 shall be devoted strictly to the purposes for which the fund is created and no part thereof shall be transferred or diverted in any manner or for any purpose. Any transfer or diversion of the money or credits from any of the funds to another fund or to a purpose other and different from that for which appropriated shall render any city councilman voting therefor liable on his official bond for the amount so diverted or used; Provided, inspectors of public works paid from special funds may receive pay for their services from the general fund of the city monthly as other employees. Upon the completion of such work, and the levy and collection of the special fund to pay for the same, or the sale of bonds for public works or improvements, an amount equal to that paid said inspectors from the general fund may be taken from such special funds and returned to the general fund from which it was temporarily taken; and the council is hereby authorized to include the cost of inspection in such special funds to be levied and collected.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. IV, § 6, p. 471;

C.S.1922, § 3630;

C.S.1929, § 14-507;

R.S.1943, § 14-507.